Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB317.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 76 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCESec.7681. Definitions.7682. Watermark required.7683. Exceptions.7684. Penalty.§ 7681. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." Technology or tools that use predictive algorithms to create new content, including audio, code, images, text, simulations, videos and the likeness of another individual."Artificial Intelligence Generated Material." An image, text or video that used artificial intelligence in whole or in part to create the image, text, simulation or video."Watermark." A mark placed on an artificial intelligence generated image, simulation or video.§ 7682. Watermark required.An individual who creates or distributes an image, text, simulation or video using artificial intelligence shall place a watermark on 30% of the image, text or video, to which the following shall apply:(1) The watermark shall have a minimum of 50% opacity.(2) The watermark shall contain the following statement:"Artificial Intelligence Generated Material."§ 7683. Exceptions.Film or television show productions created or distributed in this Commonwealth shall be exempt from section 7682 (relating to watermark required) if one of the following is met:(1) Use of artificial intelligence for visual effects does not involve the use of an individual.(2) If the use of artificial intelligence for visual effects involves the use of an individual, the individual has provided written consent to create a likeness of the individual.§ 7684. Penalty.An individual who violates section 7682 (relating to 20250HB0317PN0274 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 watermark required) commits a misdemeanor of the second degree and shall be subject to a $1,000 fine for a first offense. An individual who commits a second or subsequent violation of section 7682 within a five-year period commits a misdemeanor of the second degree and shall be subject to a $10,000 fine.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0317PN0274 - 3 - 123456